Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 13 Banking Emergencies

19-13-1.
Proclamation of emergency.

The governor may proclaim that a banking emergency exists when it appears necessary to protect the public and the interests of those regulated institutions or of the shareholders, depositors, or other creditors of those regulated institutions. Thereupon, any or all of the regulated institutions shall be subject to special regulation by the director, until the governor, by like proclamation, declares the period of banking emergency terminated. Any action taken or order issued by the director in any of the following sections in this chapter shall, in each instance, be taken only with the approval of the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-2.
Suspension of payment of deposits.

During the period of a banking emergency, the director may, if deemed necessary for the protection of the public and of the interests of depositors and other creditors of any or all regulated institutions, order the regulated institutions to suspend or restrict, in whole or in part, the payment in currency, or by other means, of the liabilities of the regulated institutions to shareholders, depositors, and other creditors, except as hereinafter provided. The order shall become effective upon receipt by the regulated institutions of notice thereof, and shall continue in full force and effect during the period of banking emergency, until revoked or modified by the director. Whenever, in the judgment of the director, the condition of emergency, because of which the order was made, warrants action, the liability, the payment of which has been suspended or restricted, may be paid by the regulated institution, in whole or pro rata or in part, upon any terms and conditions and in any form as the director shall prescribe, provided that acceptance of any such payment, if and so far as not offered in legal tender, shall be optional with the person entitled to payment of that liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-3.
Segregation of new cash deposits.

Cash deposits, called “new cash deposits”, received by any regulated institution after an order of the director issued under the provisions of this chapter suspending or restricting withdrawals of currency from that regulated institution, and while the order remains in force either in whole or in part, shall not be subject, by reason of the order, to any limitation or restriction as to payment or withdrawal in currency or otherwise, and shall be segregated and held or invested and used solely to meet the new cash deposit liability; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of cash representing those deposits shall be kept separately in cash, or on deposit in Federal Reserve banks, or invested in obligations of the United States, or as may otherwise be authorized from time to time by order of the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or other constituted federal authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-4.
New deposits other than cash.

New deposits, other than new cash deposits, need not be segregated, but may be drawn against by check to the same extent and in the same manner as deposits existing prior to any order of the director, issued under the provisions of this chapter, and may also be drawn against under the terms of the order; provided, nevertheless, that new deposits made in any medium of exchange prescribed by the director under the provisions of this chapter shall be payable in the deposited medium of exchange, or the medium of exchange into which it may have been converted, and any such deposits may be withdrawn in whole or in part.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-5.
Bank holidays.

The director is further authorized to declare bank holidays with respect to any or all activities of any regulated institutions, whenever in the director’s judgment a declaration is required by the public interest. A bank holiday declared by the director under this section shall have the same effect, with respect to banking activities, as the appointment or proclamation of a legal holiday under the provisions of §

25-1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-6.
Conformity to federal law.

All of the regulated institutions to which this chapter is applicable shall be permitted to conform to the requirements of any federal proclamation, law, or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-7.
Violation of orders or rules.

Any person or regulated institution violating any order or any provision of any rule or regulation made by the director under the authority of this chapter, shall be punished by fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-8.
Costs and expenses.

Any costs and expenses incurred by the director in any exercise of the powers given under this chapter may be assessed by the director against the regulated institutions concerned and, when so assessed, shall be paid by those regulated institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-9.
Emergency measure.

This chapter is declared to be an emergency measure, necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace and safety, requiring the immediately effective enactment of legislation concerning the protection of deposits in regulated institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-10.
Emergency powers of the director.

In the interest of the protection of depositors in financial institutions or credit unions, the director is authorized to waive, in whole or in part, any provisions of this title relating to public hearings and/or public notice that would hinder or prevent the merger, consolidation, purchase of assets and assumption of liabilities, or other acquisition of a financial institution or credit union that is in danger of insolvency or that has been closed by the proclamation of a banking emergency in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. All waivers shall be made public as to the final decision or disposition within ninety (90) days after the waiver is granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-11.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.

19-13-13.
Chapter controlling.

The provisions of this chapter shall control if in conflict with any other legislation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 51.